Maryland, session 2025, HB0660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
5–802.
A petition for admission of a copy of a will may be filed with the [court] REGISTER
at any time before administrative or judicial probate if:
(1) The original executed will is alleged to be lost or destroyed;
(2) A duplicate reproduction of the original executed will, evidencing a copy
of the original signatures of the decedent and the witnesses, is offered for admission; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0660*

HOUSE BILL 660
(3) All the heirs at law and legatees named in the offered will execute a
consent in the manner set forth in § 5–803 of this subtitle.
5–804.
The [court] REGISTER may:
(1) [Without a hearing, issue an order authorizing:
(i) The petitioner to proceed with administrative probate in
accordance with Subtitle 3 of this title; and
(ii) The register to accept the] ADMIT A copy of [the] A will for
administrative probate; or
(2) Require the filing of judicial probate in accordance with Subtitle 4 of
this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to the estate of any decedent who died before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.